Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-30] Injunctive relief. The
director may, in addition to any other remedies available, bring an action in
any court of this State to enjoin a person from continuing any violation of
this chapter or doing any acts in furtherance thereof, and for any other relief
that the court deems appropriate. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next